Missouri, session 2026, SB1121.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 173.250, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
173.250 and 173.1541, to read as follows:
173.250. 1. There is hereby established a "Higher
Education Academic Scholarship Program" and any moneys
appropriated by the general assembly for this program shall
be used to provide scholarships for Missouri citizens to
attend a Missouri college or university of their choice
pursuant to the provisions of this section.
2. The definitions of terms set forth in section
173.1102 shall be applicable to such terms as used in this
section. In addition, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Academic scholarship", an amount of money paid by
the state of Missouri to a student pursuant to the
provisions of this section;
(2) "ACT", the American College Testing program
examination;
(3) "Approved institution", an approved public or
approved private institution as defined in section 173.1102;

SB 1121 2
(4) "Eligible student", an individual who meets the
criteria set forth in section 173.1104, excluding the
requirements of financial need and undergraduate status and,
in addition, meets the following requirements:
(a) Has achieved a qualifying score on the ACT or SAT;
(b) Is a Missouri resident who has completed secondary
coursework through graduation from high school or the
virtual public school established in section 161.670,
receipt of a general education development (GED) diploma,
completion of a program of study through homeschooling or
any other program of academic instruction that satisfies the
compulsory attendance requirement under section 167.031; and
(c) Is enrolled full time or accepted for full-time
enrollment as a postsecondary student at an approved
institution during the academic year immediately following
the completion of his or her secondary coursework;
(5) "Missouri test-takers", all Missouri high school
seniors who take the ACT or the SAT;
(6) "Qualifying score", a composite score on the ACT
or the SAT achieved in an eligible student's high school
sophomore, junior, or senior year that is in the top five
percent of Missouri test-takers, as established at the
beginning of an eligible student's final year of secondary
coursework;
(7) "Recipient", an eligible or renewal student who
receives an academic scholarship pursuant to this section;
(8) "Renewal student", an eligible student who remains
in compliance with the provisions of section 173.1104,
maintains continuous enrollment, and makes satisfactory
academic degree progress; and
(9) "SAT", the Scholastic Aptitude Test.

SB 1121 3
3. The coordinating board for higher education shall
be the administrative agency for the implementation of the
program established by this section, and shall:
(1) Promulgate reasonable rules and regulations for
the exercise of its functions and the effectuation of the
purposes of this section, including regulations for granting
scholarship deferments;
(2) Prescribe the form and the time and method of
awarding academic scholarships, and shall supervise the
processing thereof; and
(3) Select qualified recipients to receive academic
scholarships, make such awards of academic scholarships to
qualified recipients and determine the manner and method of
payment to the recipient.
4. Before the 2027-28 academic year, eligible students
shall be offered academic scholarships in the following
amounts and in the following order of priority, within the
limits of the funds appropriated and made available:
(1) Each eligible student with a qualifying score in
the top three percent of all Missouri test-takers shall be
offered an academic scholarship of up to three thousand
dollars per year. All students in the top three percent
shall receive awards of three thousand dollars before any
student in the top fourth and fifth percentiles receives any
award;
(2) Provided sufficient funds are appropriated, each
eligible student with a qualifying score in the top fourth
and fifth percentiles shall be offered an academic
scholarship of up to one thousand dollars per year.
5. Before the 2027-28 academic year, eligible students
may renew academic scholarships for their second, third, and
fourth years of postsecondary education, or as long as the

SB 1121 4
recipient is in compliance with the criteria to be a renewal
student.
6. If an eligible student is unable to enroll during
the first academic year or a renewal student ceases
attendance at an approved institution for the purpose of
providing service to a nonprofit organization, a state or
federal government agency, or any branch of the Armed Forces
of the United States, such student shall be offered an
academic scholarship upon enrollment in any approved
institution after the completion of their service, if the
student meets all other requirements for an initial or
renewal award and if the following criteria are met:
(1) For an eligible student who cannot attend an
approved institution as a result of service to a nonprofit
organization or the state or federal government, the student
returns to full-time status within twenty-seven months and
provides verification to the coordinating board for higher
education that the service to the nonprofit organization was
satisfactorily completed and was not compensated other than
for expenses, or that the service to the state or federal
100 government was satisfactorily completed; or
101 (2) For an eligible student who cannot attend an
102 approved institution as a result of military service in the
103 Armed Forces of the United States, the student returns to
104 full-time status within six months after the eligible
105 student first ceases service to the Armed Forces and
106 provides verification to the coordinating board for higher
107 education that the military service was satisfactorily
108 completed.
109 7. A recipient of an academic scholarship awarded
110 under this section may transfer from one approved

SB 1121 5
111 institution to another without losing eligibility for the
112 academic scholarship.
113 8. If a recipient of an academic scholarship at any
114 time withdraws from an approved institution so that under
115 the rules and regulations of that institution he or she is
116 entitled to a refund of any tuition, fees or other charges,
117 the institution shall pay the portion of the refund
118 attributable to the academic scholarship for that term to
119 the coordinating board for higher education.
120 9. Other provisions of this section to the contrary
121 notwithstanding, if an eligible student has been awarded an
122 initial academic scholarship pursuant to the provisions of
123 this section but is unable to attend an approved institution
124 during the first academic year because of illness,
125 disability, pregnancy or other medical need or if a renewal
126 student ceases all attendance at an approved institution
127 because of illness, disability, pregnancy or other medical
128 need, the recipient shall be eligible for an initial or
129 renewal academic scholarship upon enrollment in or return to
130 any approved institution, provided the recipient:
131 (1) Enrolls in or returns to full-time status within
132 twenty-seven months;
133 (2) Provides verification in compliance with
134 coordinating board for higher education rules of sufficient
135 medical evidence documenting an illness, disability,
136 pregnancy or other medical need of such person to require
137 that that person will not be able to use the academic
138 scholarship during the time period for which it was
139 originally offered; and
140 (3) Meets all other requirements established for
141 eligibility to receive an academic scholarship.

SB 1121 6
142 10. (1) As used in this section, "eligible program of
143 study" has the same meaning as in section 173.2553.
144 (2) For the 2027-28 academic year and all subsequent
145 academic years, subject to appropriation:
146 (a) An eligible student shall be offered academic
147 scholarships in an amount equal to the actual in-state
148 tuition charged to such eligible student for the first four
149 semesters the student is enrolled at the approved
150 institution;
151 (b) An eligible student who has completed the
152 student's first two semesters and received an academic
153 scholarship under subsections 1 to 9 of this section shall
154 be deemed an eligible student under paragraph (a) of this
155 subdivision for the student's third and fourth semesters; and
156 (c) A renewal student who is enrolled in an eligible
157 program of study may renew academic scholarships for up to
158 six semesters in an amount equal to the actual in-state
159 tuition charged to such eligible student as long as the
160 recipient is in compliance with the criteria to be a renewal
161 student.
173.1541. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Missouri Higher Education Funding Policy
Prioritization Act".
2. The Missouri department of higher education and
workforce development, in consultation with public
institutions of higher education in this state, shall:
(1) Develop a funding model for public institutions of
higher education that:
(a) Aligns funding for higher education to develop
educated persons to meet the professional and workforce
needs for the state of Missouri;

SB 1121 7
(b) Provides a level of stable, sustainable resources
that allow public institutions of higher education in this
state to serve students well and fulfill such institutions'
missions;
(c) Is based on the 2023 study commissioned by the
Missouri department of higher education and workforce
development and is developed in cooperation with public
institutions of higher education in this state and the
Missouri department of higher education and workforce
development using data, mechanics, and calculations that are
as simple and easy to understand as practicable;
(d) Includes a process for the allocation of the core
appropriations to public four-year institutions of higher
education; public community colleges, as that term is
defined in section 163.191; and State Technical College of
Missouri;
(e) Uses a cost-based approach to funding that
recognizes each institution's instructional mission and that
incorporates accountability and an outcomes-based focus; and
(f) Includes a performance component that is designed
to enhance improvement in student success and efficient
operations;
(2) Establish a plan for testing and implementing the
funding model described in this section, which plan, after
having been reviewed and consented to by two members of the
Missouri house of representatives appointed by the speaker
of the house of representatives and two members of the
Missouri senate appointed by the president pro tempore of
the senate, shall be approved by the coordinating board for
higher education and submitted to the governor and the
general assembly before August 31, 2026;

SB 1121 8
(3) Evaluate the effectiveness of the funding model
test and submit a report to the governor, the speaker of the
house of representatives, and the president pro tempore of
the senate before October 15, 2026; and
(4) Present the funding model to the coordinating
board for higher education for final approval before
November 1, 2026.
3. Such funding model shall not become effective
unless approved by the general assembly by concurrent
resolution.
4. For the 2028-29 fiscal year and all subsequent
fiscal years, the appropriation of state funding to public
four-year institutions of higher education; public community
colleges, as that term is defined in section 163.191; and
State Technical College of Missouri shall be in accordance
with such funding model approved by the general assembly.
✓